src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_IKÄLOPPU
!!  The quantitative gradation of p before u is in class `@LEXNAME@` and
!!  old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
!!  It is only a nominal compound based adjective that ends in u and has
!!  p ~ 0 gradation here:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~0 u
!!€  ikäloppu: ikäloppu+A+Sg+Nom # age-old
!!€  ikälopussa: ikäloppu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  ikälopuista: ikäloppu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  ikäloppuihin: ikäloppu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  ikälopumpi: ikäloppu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  ikälopuin: ikäloppu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  and none of the adjectives end in y and quantitative p gradation.

LEXICON ADJ_LÖRPPÖ
!!  The quantitative gradation of p before ö is in class `@LEXNAME@` and
!!  old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~0 ö
!!€  lörppö: lörppö+A+Sg+Nom # blabbermouth
!!€  lörpössä: lörppö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lörpöistä: lörppö+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  lörppöihin: lörppö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  lörpömpi: lörppö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  lörpöin: lörppö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VELTTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before o is in class `@LEXNAME@`, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 o
!!€  veltto: veltto+A+Sg+Nom # lazy
!!€  veltossa: veltto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  veltoista: veltto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  velttoihin: veltto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  veltompi: veltto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  veltoin: veltto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VIMMATTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before u is in class `@LEXNAME@`, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
!!  The u stems with quantitative t gradation are commonest with nut participle
!!  passive derivation’s back form (-ttu).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 u
!!€  vimmattu: vimmattu+A+Sg+Nom # wicked
!!€  vimmatussa: vimmattu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  vimmatuista: vimmattu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  vimmattuihin: vimmattu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  vimmatumpi: vimmattu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  vimmatuin: vimmattu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_YLENNETTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before y is in class `@LEXNAME@`, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
!!  The u stems with quantitative t gradation are commonest with nut participle
!!  passive derivation’s front (-tty).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 y
!!€  ylennetty: ylennetty+A+Sg+Nom # promoted
!!€  ylennetyssä: ylennetty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  ylennetyistä: ylennetty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  ylennettyihin: ylennetty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  ylennetympi: ylennetty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  ylennetyin: ylennetty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYYTTÖ
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before y is in class `@LEXNAME@`, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 ö
!!€  kyyttö: kyyttö+A+Sg+Nom # ?????
!!€  kyytössä: kyyttö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kyytöistä: kyyttö+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kyyttöihin: kyyttö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  kyytömpi: kyyttö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kyytöin: kyyttö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  The quantitave k gradation has a variant that allows use of apostrophe
!!  instead of nothing in the weak grade.

LEXICON ADJ_LAKO
!!  The class for o final bisyllabic stems with optional ’ is `@LEXNAME@`,
!!  this is a subset of dictionary class ¹⁻D. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~’~0 o
!!€  lako: lako+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  laossa: lako+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  la’ossa: lako+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  laompi: lako+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  laoin: lako+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:’o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:’o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  There's no k to optional apostrophe with u.
!!  nor with y and k:
!!  nor ö with k:
!!  There's none with k gradating to always apostrophe either.
!!  For examples of these, see noun classes


LEXICON ADJ_KELPO
!!  The qualitative gradation of p between vowels in o stems goes to v,
!!  the class for this is `@LEXNAME@`, the dictionary class for this is
!!  ¹⁻E.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~v o
!!€  kelpo: kelpo+A+Sg+Nom # proper
!!€  kelvossa: kelpo+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kelpoina: kelpo+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  kelvoista: kelpo+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kelvompi: kelpo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kelvoin: kelpo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:po  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  There are none ending in vowel + pu
!!  nor with y and p
!!  nor ö with p.

LEXICON ADJ_MIETO
!!  The gradation of t ~ d after o is in class `@LEXNAME@`, the
!!  dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~d o
!!€  mieto: mieto+A+Sg+Nom # mild
!!€  miedossa: mieto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mietoihin: mieto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  miedoista: mieto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  miedompi: mieto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  miedoin: mieto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
